Virginia statutes. Title 44. Military and Emergency Laws.
Chapter 3.2. Emergency Services and Disaster Law.
§ 44-146.18.
Department of Emergency Management; administration and operational control; coordinator and other personnel; powers and duties.

The State Office of Emergency Services is continued and shall hereafter be known as the Department of Emergency Management (the Department). Wherever the words “State Department of Emergency Services” are used in any law of the Commonwealth, they shall mean the Department of Emergency Management. During a declared emergency this Department shall revert to the operational control of the Governor. The Department shall have a coordinator who shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the Governor and also serve as State Emergency Planning Director. The Department shall employ the professional, technical, secretarial, and clerical employees necessary for the performance of its functions.

The Department shall in the administration of emergency services and disaster preparedness programs:

In coordination with political subdivisions and state agencies, ensure that the Commonwealth has up-to-date assessments and preparedness plans to prevent, respond to, and recover from all disasters including acts of terrorism;

Conduct a statewide emergency management assessment in cooperation with political subdivisions, private industry, and other public and private entities deemed vital to preparedness, public safety, and security. The assessment shall include a review of emergency response plans, which include the variety of hazards, natural and man-made. The assessment shall be updated annually;

Promulgate plans and programs that are conducive to adequate disaster mitigation preparedness, response, and recovery programs;

Prepare and maintain a State Emergency Operations Plan for disaster response and recovery operations that assigns primary and support responsibilities for basic emergency services functions to state agencies, organizations, and personnel as appropriate;

Coordinate and administer disaster mitigation, preparedness, response, and recovery plans and programs with the proponent federal, state, and local government agencies and related groups;

Provide guidance and assistance to state agencies and units of local government in developing and maintaining emergency management and continuity of operations (COOP) programs, plans, and systems;

Make necessary recommendations to agencies of the federal, state, or local governments on preventive and preparedness measures designed to eliminate or reduce disasters and their impact;

Determine requirements of the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions for those necessities needed in the event of a declared emergency which are not otherwise readily available;

Assist state agencies and political subdivisions in establishing and operating training programs and programs of public information and education regarding emergency services and disaster preparedness activities;

Consult with the Board of Education regarding the development and revision of a model school crisis and emergency management plan for the purpose of assisting public schools in establishing, operating, and maintaining emergency services and disaster preparedness activities;

Consult with the State Council of Higher Education in the development and revision of a model institutional crisis and emergency management plan for the purpose of assisting public and private two-year and four-year institutions of higher education in establishing, operating, and maintaining emergency services and disaster preparedness activities and, as needed, in developing an institutional crisis and emergency management plan pursuant to §

23.1-804

;

Develop standards, provide guidance, and encourage the maintenance of local and state agency emergency operations plans, which shall include the requirement for a provision that the Department of Criminal Justice Services and the Virginia Criminal Injuries Compensation Fund be contacted immediately to deploy assistance in the event of an emergency as defined in the emergency response plan when there are victims as defined in §

19.2-11.01

. The Department of Criminal Justice Services and the Virginia Criminal Injuries Compensation Fund shall be the lead coordinating agencies for those individuals determined to be victims, and the plan shall also contain current contact information for both agencies;

Prepare, maintain, coordinate, or implement emergency resource management plans and programs with federal, state, and local government agencies and related groups, and make such surveys of industries, resources, and facilities within the Commonwealth, both public and private, as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

Coordinate with the federal government and any public or private agency or entity in achieving any purpose of this chapter and in implementing programs for disaster prevention, mitigation, preparation, response, and recovery;

Establish guidelines pursuant to § 44-146.28, and administer payments to eligible applicants as authorized by the Governor;

Coordinate and be responsible for the receipt, evaluation, and dissemination of emergency services intelligence pertaining to all probable hazards affecting the Commonwealth;

Coordinate intelligence activities relating to terrorism with the Department of State Police;

Develop an emergency response plan to address the needs of individuals with household pets and service animals in the event of a disaster and assist and coordinate with local agencies in developing an emergency response plan for household pets and service animals; and

Establish and maintain an Emergency Management Equity Working Group (the Working Group) to ensure that emergency management programs and plans provide support to at-risk individuals and populations disproportionately impacted by disasters. The Working Group shall include experts from (i) the Governor’s Office of Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion and other state agencies; (ii) the public at large; and (iii) the private sector who have expertise related to at-risk and vulnerable populations and the threats faced by such populations during a disaster.The Department of Emergency Management shall ensure that all such plans, assessments, and programs required by this subsection include specific preparedness for, and response to, disasters resulting from electromagnetic pulses and geomagnetic disturbances.

The Department of Emergency Management shall during a period of impending emergency or declared emergency be responsible for:

The receipt, evaluation, and dissemination of intelligence pertaining to an impending or actual disaster;

Providing facilities from which state agencies and supporting organizations may conduct emergency operations;

Providing an adequate communications and warning system capable of notifying all political subdivisions in the Commonwealth of an impending disaster within a reasonable time;

Establishing and maintaining liaison with affected political subdivisions;

Determining requirements for disaster relief and recovery assistance;

Coordinating disaster response actions of federal, state and volunteer relief agencies; and

Coordinating and providing guidance and assistance to affected political subdivisions to ensure orderly and timely response to and recovery from disaster effects.

The Department of Emergency Management shall be provided the necessary facilities and equipment needed to perform its normal day-to-day activities and coordinate disaster-related activities of the various federal, state, and other agencies during a state of emergency declaration by the Governor or following a major disaster declaration by the President.

The Department of Emergency Management is authorized to enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to performance of any of its duties stated in this section or otherwise assigned to it by law, including contracts with the United States, other states, agencies and government subdivisions of the Commonwealth, and other appropriate public and private entities.

The Department of Emergency Management shall encourage private industries whose goods and services are deemed vital to the public good to provide annually updated preparedness assessments to the local coordinator of emergency management on or before April 1 of each year, to facilitate overall Commonwealth preparedness. For the purposes of this section, “private industry” means companies, private hospitals, and other businesses or organizations deemed by the State Coordinator of Emergency Management to be essential to the public safety and well-being of the citizens of the Commonwealth.

The Department of Emergency Management shall establish a Coordinator of Search and Rescue. Powers and duties of the Coordinator shall include:

Coordinating the search and rescue function of the Department of Emergency Management;

Coordinating with local, state, and federal agencies involved in search and rescue;

Coordinating the activities of search and rescue organizations involved in search and rescue;

Maintaining a register of search and rescue certifications, training, and responses;

Establishing a memorandum of understanding with the Virginia Search and Rescue Council and its respective member agencies regarding search and rescue efforts;

Providing on-scene search and rescue coordination when requested by an authorized person;

Providing specialized search and rescue training to police, fire-rescue, EMS, emergency managers, volunteer search and rescue responders, and others who might have a duty to respond to a search and rescue emergency;

Gathering and maintaining statistics on search and rescue in the Commonwealth;

Compiling, maintaining, and making available an inventory of search and rescue resources available in the Commonwealth; and

Periodically reviewing search and rescue cases and developing best professional practices.Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as authorizing the Department of Emergency Management to take direct operational responsibilities from local, state, or federal law enforcement in the course of search and rescue or missing person cases.

History.

1973, c. 260; 1974, c. 4; 1975, c. 11; 1979, c. 193; 1984, c. 720; 1985, cc. 443, 447; 1997, c. 893; 2000, c. 309; 2001, c. 841; 2003, c. 622; 2004, c. 690; 2005, cc. 165, 490; 2007, c. 902; 2008, cc. 450, 526; 2009, cc. 222, 269; 2012, c. 418; 2015, cc. 97, 205, 223; 2017, c. 778; 2019, c. 615; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 455.

Cross references.

As to vaccination of children upon declaration of public health emergency involving vaccine-preventable disease, see §

32.1-47.1

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, cc. 16 and 338, cl. 1 provides: “The Department of Transportation, Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy, Department of Emergency Management, Department of Motor Vehicles, Department of State Police, and other interested stakeholders shall work to establish a protocol for submission of a declaration of a state of emergency for resource shortages, as defined in § 44-146.16 of the Code of Virginia, that adversely affect the delivery of motor fuels, gasoline, diesel, kerosene, number one and two heating oils, or liquid propane gas within or outside of the Commonwealth.”

Acts 2015, cc. 16 and 338, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Emergency Management shall submit a report detailing the established protocol to the Governor and the General Assembly by January 13, 2016.”

Acts 2016, c. 73, cl. 1 provides: “That the Department of Health shall convene a work group of stakeholders, which shall include representatives of the Department of Health, the Department of Emergency Management, the State Anatomical Program, procurement organizations, and local search and rescue teams and organizations, to (i) identify and evaluate options for using human remains donated to search and rescue teams and organizations as anatomical gifts for the purpose of training dogs to find human remains during search and rescue operations and (ii) establish policies and procedures to govern the process of using anatomical gifts for such purpose. In conducting its work, the work group shall respect the sensitive nature of donation for donors and families of decedents and assure that all policies and procedures reflect and incorporate this understanding. The work group shall report its activities, findings, and recommendations to the General Assembly by December 1, 2016.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “23.1-804” was substituted for “23-9.2:9” in subdivision B 12 to conform to the recodification of Title 23 by Acts 2016, c. 588, effective October 1, 2016.

Acts 2020, c. 590, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. The Department of Emergency Management shall review its emergency services and disaster preparedness programs to determine if changes to those programs are necessary in order to address the needs of individuals with limited English proficiency and individuals with access or functional needs. The Department shall complete its review no later than November 1, 2020, and report its findings to the Chairs of the Senate Committee on General Laws and Technology and the House Committee on General Laws. Such report shall include any recommendations for legislation that would be required to fully address the needs of individuals with limited English proficiency and individuals with access or functional needs. As used in this section, “individuals with limited English proficiency” means individuals who do not speak English as their primary language and who have limited ability to read, write, speak, or understand English.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 309, in the section catchline, substituted “Department” for “Office,” and “Emergency Services” for “Emergency Management”; substituted “Emergency Management” for “Emergency Services” throughout the section; in subsection (a), substituted “State Department” for “State Office” in the second sentence; in subsection (b), inserted “emergency services and” in the introductory language;
inserted “mitigation” and inserted “response and recovery” in subdivision (1); substituted “for disaster response and recovery operations that assigns primary and support responsibilities for basic emergency services functions to state agencies, organizations and personnel as appropriate” for “relating to man-made and natural disaster concerns” in subdivision (2); substituted “disaster mitigation, preparedness, response and recovery plans” for “preparedness plans” in subdivision (3); substituted “developing and maintaining emergency management programs, plans and systems” for “designing emergency programs and plans” in subdivision (4); added “and education regarding emergency services and disaster preparedness activities” at the end of subdivision (7); added present subdivision (8), and redesignated former subdivisions (8) through (10) as present subdivisions (9) through (11); and substituted “Prepare, maintain, or coordinate or implement emergency” for “Promulgate, prepare, maintain or coordinate emergency” at the beginning of present subdivision (9); in subsection (c), rewrote subdivision (2); inserted “and volunteer relief” in subdivision (6); inserted “and volunteer relief,” in subdivision (7); inserted “Coordinating” and “response to and”; in subsection (d), substituted “a state of emergency declaration by the Governor or following a major disaster declaration by the President” for “periods of declared emergency”; and in subsection (e), added “including contracts with the United States, other states, agencies and government subdivisions of the Commonwealth, and other appropriate public and private entities” at the end.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 841, inserted present subdivisions (b) (8) and (b) (9) and redesignated former subdivisions (b) (8) through (b) (11) as present subdivisions (b) (10) through (b) (13).

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 622 substituted “the” for “this” preceding “Commonwealth” in the second sentence of subdivision a; inserted present subdivisions b 1 through 3, and redesignated former subdivisions b 1 through 13 as present subdivisions b 4 through 16; substituted “that” for “which” in subdivision b 4; inserted “impending emergency or” in the introductory language of subdivision c; and added subdivision f.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 690 substituted “subdivision 4 of §

2.2-3705

.2” for “subdivision A 57 of §

2.2-3705

” in subdivision (b) (3).

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 165 changed the style of the subsections and subdivisions, added subdivisions B 17 and B 18, and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2005 amendment by c. 490, inserted “and continuity of operations (COOP)” in subdivision B 7.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 902 added subdivision B 19 and made releated changes.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 450 and 526 are identical, and added “and, as needed, in developing an institutional crisis and emergency management plan pursuant to § 23-9.2:9” to the end of subdivision B 12.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 222 and 269 are identical, and added the language beginning “which shall include the requirement” at the end of subdivision B 13.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 418 deleted “as well as current contact information for both agencies” at the end of the first sentence and added the second sentence of subdivision B 13.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 97 deleted “State” preceding “Department of Emergency Management” throughout the section and added the second paragraph in subdivision B 19.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 205 and 223 are identical, and added subsection G.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 778 substituted “subdivision 14 of §

2.2-3705.2

” for “subdivision 4 of §

2.2-3705.2

” in subdivision B 3.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 615, in subsection A, inserted “(the Department)”; in subsection B, deleted “of Emergency Management” following “The Department”; deleted subdivision B 3, pertaining to an annual executive summary and report on the status of emergency management response plans and disclosure of sensitive information; redesignated remaining subdivisions accordingly; deleted former subdivision G 11, which read: “Providing an annual report to the Secretary of Public Safety and Homeland Security on the current readiness of Virginia’s search and rescue efforts”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 455, effective July 1, 2021, added subdivision B 19 and made stylistic changes.

§ 44-146.18:1.
Virginia Disaster Response Funds disbursements; reimbursements.

There is hereby created a nonlapsing revolving fund which shall be maintained as a separate special fund account within the state treasury, and administered by the Coordinator of Emergency Management, consistent with the purposes of this chapter. All expenses, costs, and judgments recovered pursuant to this section, and all moneys received as reimbursement in accordance with applicable provisions of federal law, shall be paid into the fund. Additionally, an annual appropriation to the fund from the general fund or other unrestricted nongeneral fund, in an amount determined by the Governor, may be authorized to carry out the purposes of this chapter. All recoveries from occurrences prior to March 10, 1983, and otherwise qualifying under this section, received subsequent to March 10, 1983, shall be paid into the fund. No moneys shall be credited to the balance in the fund until they have been received by the fund. An accounting of moneys received and disbursed shall be kept and furnished to the Governor or the General Assembly upon request.

Disbursements from the fund may be made for the following purposes and no others:

For costs and expenses, including, but not limited to personnel, administrative, and equipment costs and expenses directly incurred by the Department of Emergency Management or by any other state agency or political subdivision or other entity, acting at the direction of the Coordinator of Emergency Management, in and for preventing or alleviating damage, loss, hardship, or suffering caused by emergencies, resource shortages, or disasters; and

For procurement, maintenance, and replenishment of materials, equipment, and supplies, in such quantities and at such location as the Coordinator of Emergency Management may deem necessary to protect the public peace, health, and safety and to preserve the lives and property and economic well-being of the people of the Commonwealth; and

For costs and expenses incurred by the Department of Emergency Management or by any other state agency or political subdivision or other entity, acting at the direction of the Coordinator of Emergency Management, in the recovery from the effects of a disaster or in the restoration of public property or facilities.The Coordinator of Emergency Management shall promptly seek reimbursement from any person causing or contributing to an emergency or disaster for all sums disbursed from the fund for the protection, relief and recovery from loss or damage caused by such person. In the event a request for reimbursement is not paid within 60 days of receipt of a written demand, the claim shall be referred to the Attorney General for collection. The Coordinator of Emergency Management shall be allowed to recover all legal and court costs and other expenses incident to such actions for collection. The Coordinator is authorized to recover any sums incurred by any other state agency or political subdivision acting at the direction of the Coordinator as provided in this paragraph.

History.

1983, c. 48; 2000, c. 309; 2008, cc. 121, 157.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 309 substituted “Emergency Management” for “Emergency Services” throughout the section; and inserted “or other entity” in subdivisions 1 and 3.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 121 and 157 are identical, and deleted “natural or man-made” preceding “disasters” in subdivision 1; and substituted “60 days” for “sixty days” in the second sentence in the last paragraph.

Law Review.

For article, “Environmental Liens and Title Insurance,” see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 305 (1989).

§ 44-146.18:2.
Authority of Coordinator of Emergency Management in undeclared emergency.

In an emergency which does not warrant a gubernatorial declaration of a state of emergency, the Coordinator of Emergency Management, after consultation with and approval of the Secretary of Public Safety and Homeland Security, may enter into contracts and incur obligations necessary to prevent or alleviate damage, loss, hardship, or suffering caused by such emergency and to protect the health and safety of persons and property. In exercising the powers vested by this section, the Coordinator may proceed without regard to normal procedures pertaining to entering into contracts, incurring of obligations, rental of equipment, purchase of supplies and materials, and expenditure of public funds; however, mandatory constitutional requirements shall not be disregarded.

History.

1985, c. 443; 1990, cc. 1, 317; 2000, c. 309; 2014, cc. 115, 490.

Cross references.

As to the disposition of surplus materials by the Department of General Services, see §

2.2-1124

.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 309 substituted “Emergency Management” for “Emergency Services” in the first sentence.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 115, effective March 3, 2014, and c. 490, effective April 2, 2014, are identical, and inserted “and Homeland Security” in the first sentence.

§ 44-146.18:3.
First informer broadcasters; coordination with Department of Emergency Management.

For purposes of this section, unless the context requires otherwise, “first informer” means the critical radio or television personnel of a radio or television broadcast station engaged in (i) the process of broadcasting; (ii) the maintenance or repair of broadcast station equipment, transmitters, and generators; or (iii) the transportation of fuel for generators of broadcast stations.

Unless it is shown to endanger public safety or inhibit recovery efforts, or is otherwise prohibited by state or federal law, state and local government agencies shall permit first informer radio or television personnel with proper identification cards to access their broadcasting station within any area declared a state emergency area by the Governor for the purpose of provision of news, public service and public safety information and repairing or resupplying their facility or equipment.First informer identification cards shall be issued by the Virginia Association of Broadcasters. A list of those first informers who have been issued identification cards shall be furnished to the Virginia Department of Emergency Management and the Secretary of Veterans and Defense Affairs by the Virginia Association of Broadcasters prior to December 30 of each year.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or impair the right or ability of any news organization or its personnel to gather and report the news.

History.

2014, c. 561.

Editor’s note.

In the second paragraph of subsection B, “the Secretary of Veterans and Defense Affairs” was substituted for “the Secretary of Veterans Affairs and Homeland Security” to conform to Acts 2014, cc. 115 and 490.

§ 44-146.18:4.
State Coordinator of Emergency Management responsible for annual Virginia Comprehensive Emergency Management Report.

The Department of Emergency Management (the Department) shall create a comprehensive tabulated annual report, known as the Virginia Comprehensive Emergency Management Report (the Report), that shall include the annual Threat Hazard Identification Risk and Assessment (THIRA) report that the Department submits to the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA), as well as information on the following:

The current readiness of Virginia’s search and rescue efforts;

The jurisdictions that received financial assistance during the prior fiscal year because they were located in an area declared to be in a state of emergency, but not declared to be a major disaster area for which federal assistance was provided, and the amount each such jurisdiction received;

The status of the Commonwealth’s emergency shelter capabilities and readiness;

All assets received during the prior fiscal year as a result of a law-enforcement seizure and subsequent forfeiture by either a state or federal court and their estimated net worth;

The forfeiture of federal grant funding by any state agency that is required to return such funding as a result of not fulfilling the specifications of a grant;

The results of the annual statewide drill conducted by the Governor in accordance with § 44-146.17:2 in preparation for a potential large-scale disaster;

The number and types of training and exercises related to man-made and natural disaster preparedness that were conducted by the Department, the costs associated with such training and exercises, and the challenges and barriers to ensuring that state and local agencies are able and ready to respond to emergencies and natural disasters;

The mandates administered by state agencies and imposed on local governments, an estimate of the fiscal impact of the mandates on the affected local governments, and a written justification as to why the mandate should or should not be eliminated;

The status of continuity of operations programs, plans, and systems of the Commonwealth’s executive branch agencies. Such plans shall include a description of how the agency or institution of higher education will continue to provide essential services or perform mission essential functions during a disaster or other event that disrupts normal operations;

The state of the Commonwealth’s emergency prevention, protection, mitigation, response, and recovery efforts and the resources necessary to implement them; and

The status of emergency management response plans throughout the Commonwealth and other measures taken or recommended to prevent, respond to, or recover from disasters, including acts of terrorism. Information submitted in accordance with the procedures set forth in subdivision 14 of §

2.2-3705.2

shall not be disclosed unless:

It is requested by law-enforcement authorities in furtherance of an official investigation or the prosecution of a criminal act;

The agency holding the record is served with a proper judicial order; or

The agency holding the record has obtained written consent to release the information from the Department.

The State Coordinator of Emergency Management shall compile and submit the Report to the Secretary of Public Safety and Homeland Security, and shall provide copies to the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations, the Senate Committee on the Judiciary, the House Committee on Appropriations, and the House Committee on Public Safety, by November 1 of each year. All state and local agencies of the Commonwealth shall provide information and assistance to the State Coordinator of Emergency Management, upon request.

The Report may, with the concurrence of the Governor, include sensitive information, which shall be excluded from disclosure in accordance with subdivisions 2, 3, 4, and 6 of §

2.2-3705.2

and which, if revealed publicly, would jeopardize or compromise security plans and procedures in the Commonwealth designed to protect (i) the public or (ii) public or private critical infrastructure. Any sensitive information presented to any committee of the General Assembly shall be discussed in a closed meeting as provided in subdivision A 19 of §

2.2-3711

.

History.

2019, c. 615.

Editor’s note.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations, the Senate Committee on the Judiciary, the House Committee on Appropriations, and the House Committee on Public Safety” for “the Senate Committee on Finance, the Senate Committee for Courts of Justice, the House Committee on Appropriations, and the House Committee on Militia, Police and Public Safety” in subsection B. March 10, 2021.

§ 44-146.18:5.
Division of Public Safety Communications established; appointment of Virginia Public Safety Communications Coordinator; duties of Division.

There is established within the Department of Emergency Management a Division of Public Safety Communications (the Division), which shall be headed by a Virginia Public Safety Communications Coordinator, appointed by the State Coordinator with the advice and consent of the 9-1-1 Services Board. The Division shall consist of such personnel as the State Coordinator deems necessary. The operating expenses, administrative costs, and salaries of the employees of the Division shall be paid from the Wireless E-911 Fund created pursuant to § 56-484.17.

The Division shall provide staff support to the 9-1-1 Services Board and encourage, promote, and assist in the development and deployment of statewide enhanced emergency telecommunications systems.

History.

2020, c. 423.

§ 44-146.18:6.
Geographic Information Network Division established; powers and duties; Division Coordinator.

As used in this section, unless the context requires a different meaning:“Base map data” means the digitized common geographic data that is used by most geographic information systems applications to reference or link attribute or other geographic data.“Division” means the Geographic Information Network Division.“Geographic data” means data that contains either coordinates that reference a geographic location or area or attribute data that can be related to a geographic area or location.“Geographic information system (GIS)” means a computerized system that stores and links geographic data to allow a wide range of information processing and display operations, as well as map production, analysis, and modeling.

There is established within the Department of Emergency Management a Geographic Information Network Division (the Division), which shall foster the creative utilization of geographic information and oversee the development of a catalog of GIS data available in the Commonwealth. The Division shall be headed by a Division Coordinator who shall be under the supervision of and report to the State Coordinator of Emergency Management.

The powers and duties of the Division shall include:

Requesting the services, expertise, supplies, and facilities of the Department of Emergency Management from the State Coordinator of Emergency Management on issues concerning the Division;

Accepting grants from the United States government and agencies and instrumentalities thereof and any other source. To those ends, the Division shall have the power to comply with such conditions and execute such agreements as may be necessary or desirable;

Fixing, altering, charging, and collecting rates, rentals, and other charges for the use or sale of products of, or services rendered by, the Division, at rates that reflect the fair market value;

Soliciting, receiving, and considering proposals for funding projects or initiatives from any state or federal agency, local or regional government, public institution of higher education, nonprofit organization, or private person or corporation;

Soliciting and accepting funds, goods, and in-kind services that are part of any accepted project proposal;

Establishing ad hoc committees or project teams to investigate related technology or technical issues and providing results and recommendations for Division action; and

Establishing such bureaus, sections, or units as the Division deems appropriate to carry out its powers and duties.

The Division Coordinator shall:

Oversee the development of and recommend to the Department of Emergency Management the development of those policies, standards, and guidelines required to support state and local government exchange, acquisition, storage, use, sharing, and distribution of geographic or base map data and related technologies;

Foster the development of a coordinated comprehensive system for providing ready access to electronic state government geographic data products for individuals, businesses, and other entities;

Initiate and manage projects or conduct procurement activities relating to the development or acquisition of geographic data or statewide base map data or both;

Plan for and coordinate the development or procurement of priority geographic base map data;

Develop, maintain, and provide, in the most cost-effective manner, access to the catalog of Virginia geographic data and governmental geographic data users;

Provide, upon request, advice and guidance on all agreements and contracts from all branches of state government for geographic data acquisition and design and the installation and maintenance of geographic information systems;

Compile a data catalog consisting of descriptions of GIS coverages maintained by individual executive branch and local government agencies. Nothing in this article shall be construed to require that GIS data be physically delivered to the Division. All executive branch agencies that maintain GIS databases shall report to the Division the details of the data that they develop, acquire, and maintain. Each agency shall submit quarterly reports to the Division specifying all updates to existing data as well as all data development and acquisition currently in progress. Data exempt from the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.) need not be reported to the Division;

Identify and collect information and technical requirements to assist the Division in setting priorities for the development of state digital geographic data and base maps that meet the needs of state agencies, institutions of higher education, and local governments;

Provide services, geographic data products, and access to the repository at rates established by the Division; and

Ensure the compliance of those policies, standards, and guidelines developed by VITA required to support and govern the security of state and local government exchange, acquisition, storage, use, sharing, and distribution of geographic or base map data and related technologies.

History.

2020, c. 423.

§ 44-146.18:7.
GIS Fund created.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the GIS Fund, hereafter referred to as the Fund. The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All moneys collected pursuant to subsection C of § 44-146.18:6 shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purposes set forth in this article. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the State Coordinator of Emergency Management.

History.

2020, c. 423.

§ 44-146.18:8.
Additional powers and duties of the State Coordinator of Emergency Management.

The State Coordinator of Emergency Management shall, on the recommendation of the Division Coordinator, (i) receive and disburse funds; (ii) enter into contracts for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this article; and (iii) rent office space and procure equipment, goods, and services that are necessary to carry out the provisions of § 44-146.18:6.

History.

2020, c. 423.

§ 44-146.18:9.
Nonstock corporation to assist in the development of GIS data.

The Department of Emergency Management is hereby authorized to establish a nonstock corporation under Chapter 10 (§

13.1-801

et seq.) of Title 13.1 as an instrumentality to assist the Department of Emergency Management and the Division in the development and acquisition of geographic data and statewide base map data. On or before December 1 of each year, the Department of Emergency Management shall report on the activities of the nonstock corporation to the Governor and the General Assembly.

History.

2020, c. 423.